Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,220
Reimbursement of costs.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall reimburse the Department of Revenue and the Department of Administrative Services for all reasonable and necessary costs incurred in setting off debts pursuant to sections 77-27,210 to 77-27,221.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 35.